District of Columbia statutes.
5-114.02

Demand for proof of motor vehicle insurance.

(a)

Except when circumstances related to safety, law enforcement, or emergency medical care make it impracticable to do so, a law enforcement officer shall demand proof of insurance from the operator of any motor vehicle that:

(1)

Has been involved in a traffic accident to which the law enforcement officer has responded; or

(2)

Has been lawfully stopped by the law enforcement officer.

(b)

(1)

The failure of the operator of a motor vehicle to present proof of insurance upon demand, in violation of § 31-2413(a)(7), shall create a rebuttable presumption that the motor vehicle is being operated without required insurance being in effect, in violation of § 31-2413(a)(3).

(2)

If the operator of a motor vehicle is unable to present proof of insurance upon demand, the law enforcement officer shall issue notices of infraction for violations of § 31-2413(a)(3) and (a)(7).

(c)

A law enforcement officer may not stop a motor vehicle solely for the purpose of demanding proof of insurance.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-117, § 102, 53 DCR 2548

History